Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-510
Emergency; transfer of funds; violation; penalty.

Whenever during the current fiscal year or biennial period it becomes apparent to a governing body that due to unforeseen emergencies there is temporarily insufficient money in a particular fund to meet the requirements of the adopted budget of expenditures for that fund, the governing body may by a majority vote, unless otherwise provided by state law, transfer money from other funds to such fund. No expenditure during any fiscal year or biennial period shall be made in excess of the amounts indicated in the adopted budget statement, except as authorized in section 13-511, or by state law. Any officer or officers of any governing body who obligates funds contrary to the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 8, p. 673;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 95;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-928;

Laws 2000, LB 1116, § 7.

A determination of "emergency" under the Nebraska Budget Act is a question for a county board and will not be disturbed on appeal unless there has been an abuse of discretion. Meyer v. Colin, 204 Neb. 96, 281 N.W.2d 737 (1979).